Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-255
Act; purpose.

The purpose of the Student Discipline Act is to assure the protection of all elementary and secondary school students' constitutional right to due process and fundamental fairness within the context of an orderly and effective educational process. The sanctions defined in the act shall be interpreted at all times in the light of the principles of free speech and assembly protected under the Constitution of Nebraska and the United States Constitution and in recognition of the right of every student to public education.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,170;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 59.